Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-557
Hatching boxes and nursery ponds; disturbing prohibited; exception; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons to injure, disturb, or destroy any hatching box, hatching house, or nursery pond used for hatching or propagating fish or to injure, disturb, or destroy any spawn or fry, or fish in any hatching box, hatching house, nursery pond, or stream. The commission may take or cause to be taken any of the fish named in this section for the purpose of propagation or stocking the waters of this state. Any person violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 112, V, § 18, p. 432;

C.S.1929, § 37-518;

R.S.1943, § 37-518;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 193;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-518;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 277.